Illinois, session 104th, HB2162.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Childhood Hunger Relief Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 126/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Childhood Hunger Relief Act. 9(Source: P.A. 93-1086, eff. 2-15-05.)